Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,102
City of the metropolitan class or county; commissioner; requirements.

(1) In the case of a city of the metropolitan class, at least one commissioner shall be a member of a racial minority.

(2) In the case of a county, not more than three members of a housing agency shall be residents of the same incorporated community within the county.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 31.